src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON TJALMEDIBME !!= @CODE@  Like UDNODIBME but no comparatives. Sg Acc: tjalmedimev, Attr: tjalmedis.
! :is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 :is%>      ATTR              ; ! Special Attr form
                 :ibme%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                 :ibme%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 :ibme%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ibme%>Q1t K-CONS            ;
        +Cmp/SgGen:ibme%>Q1  R                 ;
        +Cmp/PlGen:ibme%>Q1j R                 ;
 !                :          DUVVAT            ; ! this cant be correct?

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: huvsodibme # Even-syllable test
!!€ huvsodibme:            huvsodibme+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ huvsodimev:            huvsodibme+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ huvsodis:              huvsodibme+A+Attr

LEXICON SUOLASIEHKE !!= @CODE@ -siehke. Sg Acc: suolasiegev, attr: suolasiek
                 :hke%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
          +Sg+Nom:hke%>    K-VOW            ;
                 :k%>      ATTR              ;
                 :hke%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 :hke%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
! :hke%>Q1 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:hke%>Q1t K-VOW                 ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: hánessiehke # Even-syllable test
!!€ hánessiehke:              hánessiehke+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ hánessiegev:              hánessiehke+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ hánessiek:                hánessiehke+A+Attr








!! ## Odd-syllable stems
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! ###  With CG Sorted by attr


LEXICON TJIEGOS !!= @CODE@ Attr same as pred. For adjectives with -e in second syllable e>á: divtes>diktásav in StrG. As a. in Spiik.  Sg Acc: tjiehkusav, Attr: tjiegos. Consonant gradation. 
                   :%>X3   ATTR           ;
                   :%>X3   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it K-CONS         ;
                   :%>X5   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: hánes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ måskas:              måskas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ moasskasav:          måskas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ måskas:              måskas+A+Attr
!!€ moasskasabbo:        måskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
!!€ bihtja:              bihtja+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ bihttjagav:          bihtja+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ bihtja:              bihtja+A+Attr
!!€ bihttjagabbo:        bihtja+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON LINES !!= @CODE@ Attr ending on -a. Adjektives ending on -es. Does same as TJIEGOS, but with attr -a.   As g. in Spiik.  lines, Sg Acc: lidnásav, attr: lidna. Consonant gradation.
                   :a%>    ATTR           ;
                   :es%>Q1 VUOHTA         ;
                   :es%>Q1 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :ás%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :ás%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ás%>it K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:es%>Q1 R              ;
                   :ás%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: lines # Odd-syllable test
!!€ lines:               lines+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ lidnásav:            lines+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ lidna:               lines+A+Attr
!!€ lidnásabbo:          lines+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON GALMAS !!= @CODE@  Attr ending on -a or -å. Adjectives on -as, ås- and ás. As e. in Spiik. Sg Acc: galmmasav, attr: galmma, Consonant gradation.
                   :%>    ATTR           ;
                   :s%>X2 VUOHTA         ;
                   :s%>X2 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :s%>X5 OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :s%>X5 ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:s%>it K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:s%>X2 R              ;
                   :s%>X5 ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: njuoskas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ njuoskas:               njuoskas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ njuosskasav:            njuoskas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ njuosska:               njuoskas+A+Attr
!!€ njuosskasabbo:          njuoskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



LEXICON OAMES !!= @CODE@ Attr ending on -e. Adjectives on -es with attribute -e. As g2. in Spiik. Sg Acc: oabmásav, Attr: oabme. Consonant gradation.
                   :%>        ATTR           ;
                   :s%>Q1     VUOHTA         ;
                   :s%>Q1     N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :s%>X5     OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :s%>X5     ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4sit   K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:s%>Q1     R              ;
                   :%>X4s     ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: goastes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ goastes:               goastes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ goasstásav:            goastes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ goasste:               goastes+A+Attr
!!€ goasstásabbo:          goastes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON SUOHKAT !!= @CODE@ Attr III -is, not suohkkadis but SUOHKKIS. With CG to attr, not from nom to Acc. Same as JALGGAT only with this CG. SUOHKKIS. Without CG between nom and acc. Adjectives on -at and -åt, with attribute III -is. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: suohkadav, attr: suohkkis,
                   :is%>     ATTR           ;
                   :a%>Q1t   VUOHTA         ;
                   :a%>Q1t   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :a%>Q1d   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :a%>Q1d   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1dit K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:a%>Q1t   R              ;
                   :a%>Q1d   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: rávvat # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rávvat:               rávvat+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ rávvadav:             rávvat+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rávvis:               rávvat+A+Attr
!!€ rávvadabbo:           rávvat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON MÅJDÅS !!= @CODE@ Adjectives with no attr. With CG. Sg Acc: måjddåsav. If there is an attribute that dosn't fit to any lexicon it mus be hardcoded.
                   :%>X3   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it K-CONS         ;
                   :%>X5   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: rávdes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rávdes:                rávdes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ rávddásav:             rávdes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rávddásabbo:           rávdes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 




!! Without CG
!!------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON VIEKSES !!= @CODE@ Attr same as pred. Without CG, but With vowel changes.  Sg Acc: væksásav, Attr: viekses. Like TJIEGOS only without the CG but with vowel changes. Mayby change this to a lexicon withput attr and then hardcode attr?
                   :%>     ATTR           ;
                   :%>     N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it K-CONS         ;
                   :%>X5   ODDCmp         ;


LEXICON ALEK !!= @CODE@ Attr same as pred. Without CG, without any vowel changes. Like TJIEGOS only without the CG an vowelchanges. 
                   :%>   ATTR           ;
                   :%>   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it K-CONS         ;
                   :%>   ODDCmp         ;


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: purpur # Odd-syllable test
!!€ purpur:               purpur+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ purpurav:             purpur+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ purpur:               purpur+A+Attr
!!€ purpurabbo:           purpur+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
