src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
ajiksiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ajik#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
bieljedibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bieljed TJALMEDIBME ;
biellebálduk+A+CmpNP/None:biellebáldug9 ALEK ;
bijteksiehke+A:bijtek#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
boanndisiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:boanndi#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
buoljas+A:buolljas TJIEGOS ;
bájnodibme+A:bájnod TJALMEDIBME ;
dabár+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dahpar MÅJDÅS ;
dievas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dievva GALMAS ;
dimes+A:dibm LINES ; ! Attr on -a in StG !According to Spiik
divtes+A:diktes TJIEGOS ;
duollat+A:duolºl SUOHKAT ;
dármedibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dármed TJALMEDIBME ;
fijnes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fijnn LINES ;
galmas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:galmma GALMAS ;
gieladibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gielad TJALMEDIBME ;
gienes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giednes TJIEGOS ;
gilduk+A+CmpNP/Last:gildug9 ALEK ;
gimes+A:gibm LINES ;
gimás+A:gibma GALMAS ;
goastes+A:goasste OAMES ;
gullamvánes+A:gullam#vádn LINES ;
guottodibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guottod TJALMEDIBME ;
gutjel+A:guhtjel MÅJDÅS ;
ulmusjgärnnok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ulmusj#gärnnog9 ALEK ; !  https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Eanandoallu:Ulmusjgärnnok
gábmat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gábbm SUOHKAT ;
gájkviekses+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gájk#viekses VIEKSES ;
gálos+A:gállos TJIEGOS ;
gálvas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gálvva GALMAS ;
gåjkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåjkke OAMES ;
gålmaktes+A:gålmaktes VIEKSES ;
gåmbal+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåmmbal MÅJDÅS ;
gåmbek+A+CmpNP/Last:gåmbeg9 ALEK ;
gårrat+A:goarºr SUOHKAT ; !
gærgos+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gærggos MÅJDÅS ;
hámedibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hámed TJALMEDIBME ;
hánessiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hánes#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
hárdes+A:hárddes TJIEGOS ;
jaŋás+A:jagŋa GALMAS ;
jerrat+A:jerºrad9 MÅJDÅS ;
jiermedibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiermed TJALMEDIBME ;
jámas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jábma GALMAS ;
jårbås+A:jårbbå GALMAS ;
lines+A:lidn LINES ;
loabedibme+A:loabed TJALMEDIBME ;
luotsas+A:luohtsa GALMAS ;
láhtes+A:láhttes TJIEGOS ;
lávtas+A:láktas MÅJDÅS ;
moaressiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moares#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
mujtodibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mujtod TJALMEDIBME ;
muodogehtjak+A+CmpNP/None:muodog#ehtjag9 ALEK ; ! OBS VABESS
mánnásiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánná#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
mánádibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánád TJALMEDIBME ;
måjdås+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:måjddås MÅJDÅS ;
måskos+A:måsskos TJIEGOS ;
njuorak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuorag9 ALEK ; ! could also come from njuorra
njuoskas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuosska GALMAS ;
næros+A:nærros TJIEGOS ;
oames+A:oabme OAMES ;
purpur+A:purpur ALEK ; !LOAN
rejdas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ræjddas MÅJDÅS ;
ruodnat+A:ruoddn SUOHKAT ;
ruodnásiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruodná#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
rávdes+A:rávddes MÅJDÅS ;
rávvat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rávºv SUOHKAT ;
råsjkas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roassjkas TJIEGOS ;
savvok+A+CmpNP/Last:savvog9 ALEK ;
siehke+A:sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
sjalkas+A:sjalkka GALMAS ;
sjallat+A:sjalºl SUOHKAT ;
sjerrat+A:sjerºr SUOHKAT ; ! SUOHKAT
sjuodnjat+A:sjuoddnj SUOHKAT ;
sjájak+A+CmpNP/Last:sjájag9 ALEK ;
sjánjas+A:sjádnja GALMAS ;
skámodibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skámod TJALMEDIBME ;
sluogas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sluohkas TJIEGOS ;
slåtjos+A:slåhtjos MÅJDÅS ;
sniebak+A+CmpNP/Last:sniebag9 ALEK ;
suodjat+A:suoddj SUOHKAT ;
suohkat+A:suohkk SUOHKAT ;
suolasiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suola#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
suosas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suossa GALMAS ;
surmas+A:surmmas TJIEGOS ;
suvres+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suvrres MÅJDÅS ;
sájsas+A:sájssas MÅJDÅS ;
sárnnediddjesiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sárnnediddje#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
tjaktjarávvat+A:tjaktja#rávºv SUOHKAT ;
tjiegossiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjiegos#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
tjielgos+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjielggos TJIEGOS ;
tjuodnat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuoddn SUOHKAT ;
tjáhppisrávvat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhppis#rávºv SUOHKAT ;
tjáhtjesiehke+A:tjáhtje#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
tsahkkisalek+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsahkkis#aleg9 ALEK ;
tsuskas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsusska GALMAS ;
varravánes+A:varra#vádn LINES ;
vedjat+v1+A:veddjad9 MÅJDÅS ; !As Kintel
viekses+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viekses VIEKSES ;
vuojtodibme+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuojtod TJALMEDIBME ;
vuorassiehke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoras#sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
váduk+A+CmpNP/None:vádug9 ALEK ;
vánes+A:vádn LINES ;
ájles+A:ájlles TJIEGOS ;
årodibme+A:årod TJALMEDIBME ;
gámbal+v3+A:gámbil VIEKSES ; !LOAN gammel
